lt-LT: Bosinės armonikėlės derinimo sistema: Kompromisinis derinimas; Tolygiai temperuotas derinimas; Tiksliosios intonacijos derinimas; Orkestrinis derinimas; Kita
es: Sistema de afinación de la armónica de bajo: Afinación de compromiso; Temperamento igual; Afinación justa; Afinación de orquesta; Otro
vi: Hệ thống điều chỉnh âm thanh kèn harmonica bass: Chỉnh âm thỏa hiệp; Bình quân luật; Ngữ điệu tự nhiên; Chỉnh âm dàn nhạc; Khác
zh-CN: 低音口琴调音系统: 妥协律; 十二平均律; 纯律; 管弦乐调音; 其他
pt-PT: Sistema de afinação da harmónica baixo: Compromisso; Temperamento igual; Entoação justa; Afinação de orquestra; Outro
ru: Система настройки бас-гармоники: Компромиссная; Равномерно темперированная; Чистая интонация; Оркестровый строй; Другое
pl: System strojenia harmonijki basowej: Kompromisowe; Równomiernie temperowane; Strój naturalny; Strój orkiestrowy; Inne
bg-BG: Система за настройване на бас хармоника: Компромисна; Равномерна темперация; Чиста интонация; Оркестрова настройка; Друго
tr: Bas armonika akort sistemi: Uzlaşma; Eşit tamperaman; Doğal entonasyon; Orkestra akordu; Diğer
pt-BR: Sistema de afinação da gaita de boca: Afinação de compromisso; Temperamento igual; Entonação justa; Afinação de orquestra; Outros
el: Σύστημα συντονισμού/κουρδίσματος φυσαρμόνικας μπάσου: Συμβιβαστικό; Συγκερασμένο; Καθαρό κούρδισμα; Ορχηστρικό κούρδισμα; Άλλο
sv: Stämningssystem för munspel: Kompromiss; Liksvävig temperatur; Ren stämning; Orkesterstämning; Övrigt
en: Bass harmonica tuning system: Compromise; Equal temperament; Just intonation; Orchestra tuning; Other
ro-RO: Sistem de acordare a muzicuței bas: Compromis; Temperament egal; Intonație pură; Acordaj orchestral; Altele
hr-HR: Sustav za ugađanje bas usne harmonike: Kompromisno ugađanje; Jednaka temperiranost; Prirodna intonacija; Orkestralno ugađanje; Ostalo
de: Bassharmonika-Stimmsystem: Kompromissstimmung; Gleichstufige Stimmung; Reine Stimmung; Orchesterstimmung; Sonstige
sl-SI: Sistem za uglaševanje basovskih orglic: Kompromisno; Enakomerna temperacija; Čista uglasitev; Orkestrska uglasitev; Drugo
nb: Bassmunnspill-stemmingssystem: Kompromiss; Liksvevende temperatur; Ren stemming; Orkesterstemming; Annet
hu: Basszusharmonika-hangolórendszer: Kompromisszumos; Kiegyenlített hangolás; Tiszta hangolás; Zenekari hangolás; Egyéb
fr: Système d’accordage de l’harmonica basse: Compromis; Tempérament égal; Intonation juste; Accordage d’orchestre; Autre
zh-TW: 低音口琴調音系統: 折衷調音; 十二平均律; 純律; 管弦樂調音; 其他
sk-SK: Systém ladenia basovej harmoniky: Kompromisné; Rovnomerne temperované; Čisté ladenie; Orchestrálne ladenie; Iné
nl: Basharmonica stemsysteem: Compromis; Gelijkzwevende stemming; Reine stemming; Orkeststemming; Overig
ja: ベースハーモニカのチューニングシステム: 折衷律; 平均律; 純正律; オーケストラチューニング; その他
fi: Bassohuuliharpun viritysjärjestelmä: Kompromissi; Tasavireinen; Puhdas vire; Orkesterivire; Muu
it: sistema di accordatura per armonica basso: Compromesso; Temperamento equabile; Intonazione naturale; Accordatura da orchestra; Altro
ko: 베이스 하모니카 조율 체계: 절충률; 평균율; 순정률; 오케스트라 튜닝; 기타
da: Stemningssystem på basmundharmonikaen: Kompromis; Ligesvævende temperatur; Ren stemning; Orkesterstemning; Andet
cs: Systém ladění basové harmoniky: Kompromisní ladění; Rovnoměrně temperované ladění; Čisté ladění; Orchestrální ladění; Jiné
th: ระบบการตั้งเสียงฮาร์โมนิกาเบส: แบบประนีประนอม; แบบแบ่งเท่า; แบบจัสต์; แบบออร์เคสตรา; อื่นๆ